District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.15a

Redevelopment of existing convention center site.

Any proposed exclusive right agreement to redevelop the existing convention center site, which is legally described as Square 374 and Lot 848 and excluding Lot 829, shall be submitted with a proposed resolution by the Mayor to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within the 30-day period of review, the proposed resolution and exclusive right agreement shall be deemed approved.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 215a
as added Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-286, § 2, 50 DCR 944

History

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Council Review of Existing Convention Center Site Redevelopment Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-224, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2737).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 10-1202.15a, see § 2 of Council Review of Existing Convention Center Site Redevelopment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-425, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7629).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 10-1202.15a, see § 2 of Council Review of Existing Convention Center Site Redevelopment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-539, December 2, 2002, 49 DCR 11655).

Emergency Legislation

Delegation of Authority to Execute Exclusive Rights Agreements, Land Disposition Agreements, Deeds and Associated Documents with Respect to Certain Real Estate, see Mayor’s Order 2005-28, February 2, 2005 ( 52 DCR 2848).

Delegation of Authority

Resolution 16-165, the “Revised Old Convention Center Site Disposition Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective June 7, 2005.

Resolution 16-166, the “Revised Old Convention Center Site Exclusive Right Agreement Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective June 7, 2005.

Resolutions